Washington statutes.
RCW 35.30.030

Assessment, levy and collection of taxes.

The city council shall have power to provide by ordinance a complete system for the assessment, levy, and collection of all city taxes. All taxes assessed together with any percentage imposed for delinquency and the cost of collection, shall constitute liens on the property assessed from and after the first day of November each year; which liens may be enforced by a summary sale of such property, and the execution and delivery of all necessary certificates and deeds therefor, under such regulations as may be prescribed by ordinance or by action in any court of competent jurisdiction to foreclose such liens: PROVIDED, That any property sold for taxes shall be subject to redemption within the time and within the manner provided or that may hereafter be provided by law for the redemption of property sold for state and county taxes.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.30.030. Prior: 1899 c 69 s 3; RRS s 8946.]